Illinois, session 104th, HB3276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; lottery sports 8wagering pilot program. To provide for the expeditious and 9timely implementation of the lottery sports wagering pilot 10program, emergency rules implementing the lottery sports 11wagering pilot program under Section 25-70a of the Sports 12Wagering Act may be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by 13the Department of the Lottery. The adoption of emergency rules 14authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be 15necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 10. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by 19changing Sections 9.3 and 20 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 1605/9.3)21    Sec. 9.3. Expenditure and distribution of lottery   HB3276- 2 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1proceeds.2    (a) Beginning July 1, 2022, except as provided in Sections 321.4, 21.5, 21.6, 21.7, 21.8, 21.9, 21.10, 21.11, 21.13, 421.15, and 21.16 of this Law and Section 25-70a 25-70 of the 5Sports Wagering Act, the Department shall distribute all 6proceeds of lottery tickets and shares sold in the following 7priority and manner:8        (1) The payment of prizes and retailer bonuses.9        (2) The payment of costs incurred in the operation and 10    administration of the Lottery, including the payment of 11    sums due to the private manager under the management 12    agreement with the Department and including costs of 13    administering the Lottery sports wagering program pursuant 14    to Section 25-70a 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act.15        (3) On the last day of each month or as soon thereafter 16    as possible, the State Comptroller shall direct and the 17    State Treasurer shall transfer from the State Lottery Fund 18    to the Common School Fund the Department's estimate of net 19    lottery proceeds.20        (4) If an amount in excess of the annual net lottery 21    proceeds is transferred for a fiscal year, then the 22    Department shall offset the monthly transfers of estimated 23    net lottery proceeds during the following fiscal year by 24    that excess amount. If an amount less than the annual net 25    lottery proceeds is transferred for a fiscal year, then 26    after the related annual fiscal year audit is completed   HB3276- 3 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1    following such fiscal year, the Department shall direct 2    the deposit of any remaining annual net lottery proceeds 3    from such fiscal year, subject to payments under 4    paragraphs (1) and (2), into the Common School Fund as 5    soon thereafter as possible.6    (b) The net lottery proceeds shall be determined by 7deducting from total annual lottery proceeds the expenditures 8required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a). The 9total annual lottery proceeds and annual net lottery proceeds 10shall be determined according to generally accepted accounting 11principles for governmental entities and verified by an annual 12fiscal year audit.13(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 14    (20 ILCS 1605/20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170)15    Sec. 20. State Lottery Fund. 16    (a) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund 17to be known as the State Lottery Fund. Such fund shall consist 18of all revenues received from (1) the sale of lottery tickets 19or shares, (net of commissions, fees representing those 20expenses that are directly proportionate to the sale of 21tickets or shares at the agent location, and prizes of less 22than $600 which have been validly paid at the agent level), (2) 23application fees, and (3) all other sources including moneys 24credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or source 25pursuant to law. Interest earnings of the State Lottery Fund   HB3276- 4 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1shall be credited to the Common School Fund.2    (a-5) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 321.4 of this Act shall be in accordance with Section 21.4. 4    (b) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 521.5 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.5. 6    (c) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 721.6 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.6.8    (d) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 921.7 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.7. 10    (e) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1121.8 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.8. 12    (f) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1321.9 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.9. 14    (g) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1521.10 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.10. 16    (h) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1721.11 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.11. 18    (i) (Blank). 19    (j) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2021.13 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.13.21    (k) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2225-70a 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act shall be in accordance 23with Section 25-70a 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act. 24    (l) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2521.15 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.15. 26    (m) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section   HB3276- 5 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b121.16 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.16.2(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 3    Section 15. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 4Section 25-15 and by adding Section 25-70a as follows: 5    (230 ILCS 45/25-15)6    Sec. 25-15. Board duties and powers. 7    (a) Except for sports wagering conducted under Section 825-70a 25-70, the Board shall have the authority to regulate 9the conduct of sports wagering under this Act.10    (b) The Board may adopt any rules the Board considers 11necessary for the successful implementation, administration, 12and enforcement of this Act, except for Section 25-70a 25-70. 13Rules proposed by the Board may be adopted as emergency rules 14pursuant to Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 15Procedure Act.16    (c) The Board shall levy and collect all fees, surcharges, 17civil penalties, and monthly taxes on adjusted gross sports 18wagering receipts imposed by this Act and deposit all moneys 19into the Sports Wagering Fund, except as otherwise provided 20under this Act.21    (d) The Board may exercise any other powers necessary to 22enforce the provisions of this Act that it regulates and the 23rules of the Board.24    (e) The Board shall adopt rules for a license to be   HB3276- 6 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1employed by a master sports wagering licensee when the 2employee works in a designated gaming area that has sports 3wagering or performs duties in furtherance of or associated 4with the operation of sports wagering by the master sports 5wagering licensee (occupational license), which shall require 6an annual license fee of $250. However, occupational licenses 7issued under the Illinois Gambling Act for employees of an 8owners license or organization gaming licensee, once granted, 9are considered equivalent licenses to work in sports wagering 10positions located at the same gaming facility. License fees 11shall be deposited into the State Gaming Fund and used for the 12administration of this Act.13    (f) The Board may require that licensees share, in real 14time and at the sports wagering account level, information 15regarding a wagerer, amount and type of wager, the time the 16wager was placed, the location of the wager, including the 17Internet protocol address, if applicable, the outcome of the 18wager, and records of abnormal wagering activity. Information 19shared under this subsection (f) must be submitted in the form 20and manner as required by rule. If a sports governing body has 21notified the Board that real-time information sharing for 22wagers placed on its sports events is necessary and desirable, 23licensees may share the same information in the form and 24manner required by the Board by rule with the sports governing 25body or its designee with respect to wagers on its sports 26events subject to applicable federal, State, or local laws or   HB3276- 7 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1regulations, including, without limitation, privacy laws and 2regulations. Such information may be provided in anonymized 3form and may be used by a sports governing body solely for 4integrity purposes. For purposes of this subsection (f), "real 5time" "real-time" means a commercially reasonable periodic 6interval.7    (g) A master sports wagering licensee, professional sports 8team, league, or association, sports governing body, or 9institution of higher education may submit to the Board in 10writing a request to prohibit a type or form of wagering if the 11master sports wagering licensee, professional sports team, 12league, or association, sports governing body, or institution 13of higher education believes that such wagering by type or 14form is contrary to public policy, unfair to consumers, or 15affects the integrity of a particular sport or the sports 16betting industry. The Board shall grant the request upon a 17demonstration of good cause from the requester and 18consultation with licensees. The Board shall respond to a 19request pursuant to this subsection (g) concerning a 20particular event before the start of the event or, if it is not 21feasible to respond before the start of the event, as soon as 22practicable.23    (h) The Board and master sports wagering licensees may 24cooperate with investigations conducted by sports governing 25bodies or law enforcement agencies, including, but not limited 26to, providing and facilitating the provision of account-level   HB3276- 8 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1betting information and audio or video files relating to 2persons placing wagers.3    (i) A master sports wagering licensee shall make 4commercially reasonable efforts to promptly notify the Board 5any information relating to:6        (1) criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced 7    against the master sports wagering licensee in connection 8    with its operations;9        (2) abnormal wagering activity or patterns that may 10    indicate a concern with the integrity of a sports event or 11    sports events;12        (3) any potential breach of the relevant sports 13    governing body's internal rules and codes of conduct 14    pertaining to sports wagering that a licensee has 15    knowledge of;16        (4) any other conduct that corrupts a wagering outcome 17    of a sports event or sports events for purposes of 18    financial gain, including match fixing; and19        (5) suspicious or illegal wagering activities, 20    including use of funds derived from illegal activity, 21    wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal 22    activity, using agents to place wagers, and using false 23    identification.24    A master sports wagering licensee shall also make 25commercially reasonable efforts to promptly report information 26relating to conduct described in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4)   HB3276- 9 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1of this subsection (i) to the relevant sports governing body.2(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21; 3revised 8-13-24.) 4    (230 ILCS 45/25-70a new)5    Sec. 25-70a. Lottery sports wagering pilot program.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Central lottery system" means the hardware, software, 8peripherals, platform, and network components that link and 9support all required lottery games, programs, and lottery 10terminals, including, but not limited to, Illinois sports 11betting games and programs through sports lottery terminals.12    "Central lottery system provider" means an individual, 13partnership, corporation, or limited liability company that 14provides the hardware, software, peripherals, platform, risk 15management, operations, support services, and network 16components that link and support all required lottery games 17and lottery terminals, including, but not limited to, Illinois 18lottery sports betting games and programs through sports 19lottery terminals.20    "Department" means the Department of the Lottery.21    "Electronic card" means a card purchased from a lottery 22retailer.23    "Lottery game" means any game provided for sale or 24distribution by the Illinois lottery, including, but not 25limited to, Illinois sports betting games, including those   HB3276- 10 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1defined in Section 25 of this Act and 11 Ill. Adm. Code Part 21900, and programs through sports lottery terminals.3    "Lottery retailer" means a location licensed by the 4Department or otherwise eligible for a license to sell lottery 5tickets or shares, including any licensed retail establishment 6where alcoholic liquor is drawn, poured, mixed, or otherwise 7served for consumption on premises, whether the establishment 8operates on a nonprofit or for-profit basis, any location or 9establishment that is licensed to operate video gaming 10terminals, and any other retail food establishment.11    "Sports lottery systems" means systems provided by the 12central system provider consisting of sports wagering 13products, including those defined in Section 25 of this Act 14and 11 Ill. Adm. Code Part 1900, risk management, operations, 15and support services.16    "Sports lottery terminal" means a terminal linked to the 17central system in which bills or coins are deposited or an 18electronic card is inserted in order to place wagers on a 19sports event and lottery offerings and includes sports 20wagering conducted over the Internet or through mobile 21applications or another digital platform.22    (b) Lottery games are a part of the private management 23agreement and competitive bidding process as set forth in 24Section 9.1.25    (c) Every sports lottery terminal offered in this State 26for play shall first be tested and approved pursuant to the   HB3276- 11 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1rules of the Department, and each sports lottery terminal 2offered in this State for play shall conform to an approved 3model, which shall be ready for play in Illinois within 90 days 4after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 5General Assembly and any system testing dates designated by 6the Department. For the examination of sports lottery 7terminals and associated equipment as required by this 8Section, the central lottery system provider may use the 9services of one or more independent outside testing 10laboratories that have been accredited by a national 11accreditation body and that, in the judgment of the 12Department, are qualified to perform such examinations. Every 13sports lottery terminal offered in this State for play must 14meet minimum standards set by an independent outside testing 15laboratory approved by the Department.16    (d) Sports lottery terminals may be placed in any lottery 17retail location in the State.18    (e) A sports lottery terminal may not directly dispense 19coins, cash, tokens, or any other article of exchange or value 20except for receipt tickets. Tickets shall be dispensed by 21pressing the ticket dispensing button on the sports lottery 22terminal at the end of the placement of one's wager or wagers. 23The ticket shall indicate information as required by the 24Department.25    (f) No lottery retailer may cause or permit any person 26under the age of 21 years to use a sports lottery terminal or   HB3276- 12 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1sports wagering application. A lottery retailer who knowingly 2causes or permits a person under the age of 21 years to use a 3sports lottery terminal or sports wagering application is 4guilty of a business offense and shall be fined an amount not 5to exceed $5,000.6    (g) A sports lottery terminal shall accept any wagers as 7determined by rule by the Department, including those defined 8in Section 25 of this Act and 11 Ill. Adm. Code Part 1900. The 9payouts for the sports lottery program shall be set by the 10Department.11    Of the gross gaming revenue remaining, which is calculated 12as the gross dollars played minus prizes paid, to be 13distributed as follows:14        (1) 30% to the State of Illinois, of which the local 15    municipality shall receive 5%.16        (2) 20% to the central system provider.17        (3) The remaining split evenly between the owner and 18    operator of the sports lottery terminal and the lottery 19    retailer.20    (h) The Department shall have exclusive jurisdiction over 21and shall supervise all lottery sports wagering operations 22governed by this Section. The Department shall implement and 23administer the lottery sports wagering pilot program no later 24than June 30, 2025. The Department shall have all powers 25necessary and proper to execute the provisions of this Section 26fully and effectively, including, but not limited to, the   HB3276- 13 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1following:2        (1) To investigate applicants and determine the 3    eligibility of applicants for licenses with a goal of 4    advancing minority business opportunities including 5    lottery retailer ownership of sports lottery terminals.6        (2) To have jurisdiction and supervision over all 7    lottery sports wagering operations in this State.8        (3) To adopt rules for the purpose of administering 9    the provisions of this Section and to adopt rules and 10    conditions under which all lottery sports wagering in the 11    State shall be conducted. Such rules are to provide for 12    the prevention of practices detrimental to the public 13    interest and for the best interests of lottery sports 14    wagering, including rules (i) regarding the inspection of 15    such licensees necessary to operate a lottery retailer 16    under any laws or rules applicable to licensees, (ii) to 17    impose penalties for violations of the Act and its rules, 18    (iii) establishing standards for advertising lottery 19    sports wagering, (iv) to effectuate policies that advance 20    minority business ownership and participation in the 21    sports lottery program, and (v) to apportion the total 22    revenues accruing from the lottery sports wagering pilot 23    program for the purchase or lease of the hardware.24    (i) The Department shall adopt emergency rules to 25administer this Section in accordance with Section 5-45 of the 26Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.  HB3276- 14 -LRB104 09923 LNS 19993 b1    (j) For the privilege of operating lottery sports wagering 2under this Section, all proceeds minus net of proceeds 3returned to players shall be electronically transferred daily 4or weekly, at the discretion of the Director of the Lottery, 5into the State Lottery Fund. After amounts owed to the central 6system provider and licensed agents, as determined by the 7Department, are paid from the moneys deposited into the State 8Lottery Fund under this subsection, the remainder shall be 9transferred on the 15th of each month to the Capital Projects 10Fund.11    (k) The Department shall be responsible for facilitating 12either the purchase or lease of all sports lottery terminals, 13including facilitating opportunities for minority business 14lottery retailers to obtain suitable financing. The Department 15shall allow for any licensed terminal operator under the Video 16Gaming Act or owners licensee under the Illinois Gambling Act 17to purchase or lease the sports lottery terminals and shall 18allow for a lottery retail location to own or lease the sports 19lottery terminals. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.